Idaho statutes. Title 42 IRRIGATION AND DRAINAGE — WATER RIGHTS AND RECLAMATION
Chapter 14 ADJUDICATION OF WATER RIGHTS
§ 42-1424. Summary supplemental adjudication of water rights.

Where an adjudication of a water system has been commenced prior to July 1, 1986, or where an adjudication of a water system has been commenced pursuant to subsection (3) of section 42-1404, Idaho Code, resulting in a decree of any court of competent jurisdiction, and thereafter it appears that any claimant having the right to the use of any part of those waters was not included in the decree as a party, and the right was not determined thereby, or that a claimant subsequent to the decree has acquired any right to the use of those waters, the claimant may bring an action to have such right adjudicated in the manner specified in subsection (3) of this section.

Where a general adjudication of a water system has been commenced or enlarged after July 1, 1986, pursuant to section 42-1405 or 42-1406, Idaho Code, resulting in a decree of any court of competent jurisdiction, and thereafter, it appears that a claimant subsequent to the decree has acquired any right to the use of those waters, or that a claimant who possesses a water right designated in paragraphs (a) through (d) of subsection (1) of section 42-1420, Idaho Code, did not have those water rights determined, the claimant may bring an action to have those water rights adjudicated in the manner specified in subsection (3) of this section.

The following procedure shall be used for any supplemental adjudication:

A claimant may bring an action in the district court that originally heard the general adjudication to conduct a supplemental adjudication of the water rights of the claimant; and

The claimant shall, in his complaint, set forth his acceptance as binding upon him of all prior applicable decrees and the findings of fact and conclusions of law upon which they are based, shall request the commencement of a supplemental adjudication and shall set forth the claimed water right in a notice of claim form furnished by the director and attached to the complaint. Thereupon, the district court shall issue a summons and it shall be served upon the state of Idaho and the United States; and

After return of service of summons, the claimant shall cause to be published once a week for not less than three (3) weeks, a notice of the pendency and purpose of the action in such newspaper or newspapers as the judge of the district court may order, which notice shall contain the title of the court and the cause, the name and post-office address of the claimant, the date of priority of the water right claimed, the source of the water supply, the amount of water claimed, in general the nature of the water use, the approximate location of the point of diversion, and the place of use; and

Any person who may be injured and who objects to the water right claimed by the claimant, as described in the published notice, shall, within forty-five (45) days of the date of the first publication of notice, file with the district court written notice of such objection stating the reasons for the objection. A copy of the objection shall be served upon the claimant, upon all other parties of record in the action, the watermasters, and the director; and

The district court may request that the director determine the water rights in accordance with the procedures set forth in sections 42-1410 through 42-1413, Idaho Code; and

The director, within thirty (30) days after the district court requests the director to prepare a director’s report in accordance with sections 42-1410 through 42-1413, Idaho Code, shall file with the court notification as to whether the director will conduct an examination of the water rights claimed in the complaint in accordance with the procedures set forth in sections 42-1410 through 42-1413, Idaho Code; and

Notification to the court that the director will proceed in accordance with sections 42-1410 through 42-1413, Idaho Code, shall include an approximation of the time when the director’s report will be completed, and an estimate of the director’s costs that will be incurred in conducting the examination and in preparing the reports; and

The claimant shall then be required to advance to the director, the estimated costs to be incurred by the director in conducting the examination and in preparing the reports. Prior to the filing of the director’s report with the court, the claimant shall pay the balance of the director’s verified costs or be refunded any unused estimated costs advanced to the director. In the event that the claimant shall contest the director’s costs, the court shall then determine the reasonable costs to be paid by the claimant; and

The director shall file the report with the court upon completion and shall send a copy thereof to all parties to the action. Objections to the report of the director and hearing upon the objections shall be in accordance with the provisions of section 42-1412, Idaho Code; and

For those cases in which the director notifies the district court that the director does not intend to proceed in accordance with sections 42-1410 through 42-1413, Idaho Code, the cause may thereafter be brought on for hearing in open court, and any claimant having filed a timely objection with the court may appear and defend against the claim.

The court’s decree shall determine the rights of the claimant in accordance with the proof submitted but subject to the terms of the original decree or decrees. The decree shall contain or incorporate a statement of each element of a water right as stated in subsections (2) and (3) of section 42-1411, Idaho Code, as applicable. The decree shall also determine all other matters necessary for the efficient administration of the water rights. Whereupon water shall be distributed to the claimant in accordance therewith and in the same manner as though the claimant’s right had been included in the decree or decrees.

Any person who has appeared in the action may appeal in accordance with the Idaho appellate rules from the decree entered in the action hereby authorized to be brought.

Parties.

Where the United States was interested in a contract with an irrigation district and such district brought an action for an adjudication of its water rights, which were affected by said contract, the United States was an indispensable party to such suit, and this was true notwithstanding the fact that the secretary of the interior was made a party, and that the contract in question was made and executed through and by him, and neither was the situation changed by the fact that there had been prior decree of the state court adjudicating such rights wherein the secretary was a party defendant. American Falls Reservoir Dist. No. 2 v. Crandall, 82 F.2d 973, modified, 85 F.2d 865 (9th Cir. 1936).

Construction company becoming equitable owner of irrigation works upon completion of system had sufficient interest to maintain action for supplemental adjudication of water rights though no formal conveyance was made until after commencement of action. Big Wood Canal Co. v. Chapman, 45 Idaho 380, 263 P. 45 (1927).

Watermaster holds over until his successor is elected or appointed and has qualified, and when office has not thus been vacated, he is proper party defendant. Big Wood Canal Co. v. Chapman, 45 Idaho 380, 263 P. 45 (1927).

§ 42-1425. Accomplished transfers.

Legislative findings regarding accomplished transfers and the public interest.

The legislature finds and declares that, prior to the commencement of the Snake River basin adjudication, the northern Idaho adjudications, and the Bear River basin adjudication, many persons entitled to the use of water or owning land to which water has been made appurtenant either by decree of the court or under provisions of the constitution and statutes of this state changed the place of use, point of diversion, nature or purpose of use, or period of use of their water rights without compliance with the transfer provisions of sections 42-108 and 42-222, Idaho Code.

The legislature finds that many of these changes occurred with the knowledge of other water users and that the water has been distributed to the right as changed. The legislature further finds and declares that the continuation of the historic water use patterns resulting from these changes is in the local public interest provided no other existing water right was injured at the time of the change. Denial of a claim based solely upon a failure to comply with sections 42-108 and 42-222, Idaho Code, where no injury or enlargement exists, would cause significant undue financial impact to a claimant and the local economy. Approval of the accomplished transfer through the procedure set forth in this section avoids the harsh economic impacts that would result from a denial of the claim.

The legislature further finds and declares that examination of these changes by the director through the procedures of section 42-222, Idaho Code, would be impractical and unduly burdensome. The more limited examination of these changes provided for in this section constitutes a reasonable procedure for an expeditious review by the director while ensuring that the changes do not injure other existing water rights or constitute an enlargement of use of the original right.

Any change of place of use, point of diversion, nature or purpose of use, or period of use of a water right by any person entitled to use of water or owning any land to which water has been made appurtenant, either by decree of the court or under the provisions of the constitution and statutes of this state, prior to November 19, 1987, the date of commencement of the Snake River basin adjudication, prior to January 1, 2006, for the northern Idaho adjudications authorized by section 42-1406B, Idaho Code, and prior to the date of commencement of the Bear River basin adjudication authorized by section 42-1406C, Idaho Code, may be claimed in the applicable general adjudication even though the person has not complied with sections 42-108 and 42-222, Idaho Code, provided no other water rights existing on the date of the change were injured and the change did not result in an enlargement of the original right. Except for the consent requirements of section 42-108, Idaho Code, all requirements of sections 42-108 and 42-222, Idaho Code, are hereby waived in accordance with the following procedures:

If an objection is filed to a recommendation for accomplished change of place of use, point of diversion, nature or purpose of use, or period of use, the district court shall remand the water right to the director for further hearing to determine whether the change injured a water right existing on the date of the change or constituted an enlargement of the original right. After a hearing, the director shall submit a supplemental report to the district court setting forth his findings and conclusions. If the claimant or any person who filed an objection to the accomplished transfer is aggrieved by the director’s determination, they may seek review before the district court. If the change is disallowed, the claimant shall be entitled to resume use of the original water right, provided such resumption of use will not cause injury or can be mitigated to prevent injury to existing water rights. The unapproved change shall not be deemed a forfeiture or abandonment of the original water right.
(b) This section is not applicable to any claim based upon an enlargement of use.

§ 42-1426. Enlargements — Waiver of mandatory permit requirements.

Legislative findings regarding enlargements:

The legislature finds that several adjudications of water rights were commenced or will be commenced in the state of Idaho subsequent to the mandatory permit system provided in sections 42-201 and 42-229, Idaho Code. These adjudications include the following, with associated commencement dates:

Snake River basin adjudication, November 19, 1987;

Coeur d’Alene-Spokane River basin adjudication, November 12, 2008;

Palouse River basin adjudication, March 1, 2017;

Clark Fork-Pend Oreille River basin adjudication, not yet commenced; and

Bear River basin adjudication, not yet commenced.

The legislature further finds that it is in the public interest to waive certain statutory provisions for the appropriation of water that has been diverted and applied to beneficial use to ensure the economic and agricultural base in the state of Idaho as it existed on the date of the commencement of an adjudication and to maintain historic water use patterns existing on that date.

The mandatory permit requirements of sections 42-201 and 42-229, Idaho Code, are waived, and a new water right may be decreed for the enlarged use of the original water right based upon the diversion and application to beneficial use, with a priority date as of the date of completion of the enlargement of use for any enlargement occurring on or before the commencement date of an adjudication; provided however, that the rate of diversion of the original water right and the separate water right for the enlarged use, combined, shall not exceed the rate of diversion authorized for the original water right; and further provided, that the enlargement in use did not injure water rights existing on the date of the enlargement of use. An enlargement may be decreed if conditions directly related to the injury can be imposed on the original water right and the new water right that mitigate any injury to a water right existing on the date of enactment of this act. If injury to a water right later in time cannot be mitigated, then the new right for the enlarged use shall be advanced to a date one (1) day later than the priority date for the junior water right injured by the enlargement. It is further provided that any such enlargement of use allowed in a general adjudication shall not constitute an abandonment or forfeiture of the original water right to the extent of current use.
(3) The director shall publish a notice of enlargement of water right for all water rights recommended under this section. The notice shall contain a summary of the notice of claim and shall be published in the same manner as notices for applications to appropriate water in section 42-203A, Idaho Code. Any person who has filed an application for a water right prior to the enactment of this act or who has been issued a permit for a water right prior to commencement of an adjudication but who has not filed a claim in an adjudication shall have thirty (30) days from the date of last publication of the notice of enlargement of a water right under this section to file a petition with the department of water resources to assert any claimed injury from the enlargement. No appeal of the determination of the department shall be allowed. If the applicant or permittee is dissatisfied with the determination of the department on any claim of injury, the sole remedy is to intervene in the general adjudication and assert their claim of injury in an objection to the water right.

Persons entitled to the use of water or owning any land to which water has been made appurtenant by decree, license or constitutional appropriation have, through water conservation and other means, enlarged the use of said water without increasing the rate of diversion and without complying with the mandatory permit system adopted by the legislature. Enlargements have been done with the knowledge of other water users, and water has been distributed based upon the right as enlarged. Junior water users made appropriations based upon a water system that reflected these enlarged uses. Thus, the legislature further finds and declares that it is in the public interest to waive the mandatory permit requirements for these enlargements in use prior to the commencement of a general adjudication, as long as such enlargements in use did not increase the rate of diversion of the original water right or exceed the rate of diversion for irrigation provided in section 42-202, Idaho Code, after the enlargement of use, and the enlargement of use did not reduce the quantity of water available to other water rights existing on the date of the enlargement in use.

§ 42-1427. Descriptions of water rights — Reporting and decreeing elements of a decreed or licensed water right.

Legislative findings:

The legislature finds that existing water rights are not uniformly described. Many old water rights were simply defined by source, priority date and diversion rate. Over time, the legislature and courts have made this original description of a water right more specific by the addition of other elements. Because of the increasing demand for water, it is important that the elements of a water right be standardized to allow for fair and efficient administration of the limited water supply. One (1) purpose of chapter 14, title 42, Idaho Code, is to establish, through an adjudication a uniform description for surface water rights, ground water rights and water rights which include storage.

Because of the passage of time it is not possible to establish with any degree of certainty the undefined elements of a decreed or licensed water right as they existed on the date the right was established, because water delivery has occurred based upon the historic water use patterns and custom, and because attempts to define elements of a water right based upon unknown conditions in existence on the date of the establishment of the water right could result in significant impacts upon the claimant, the local economy and tax base, the legislature finds that it is in the public interest to provide a mechanism to decree previously undefined elements of existing water rights based upon conditions existing on the date of commencement of the adjudication provided the claimant is not exceeding any previously determined and recorded element of the decreed or licensed water right.

If a licensed or decreed water right does not describe all of the elements of a water right required in section 42-1409, Idaho Code, the director shall include in his report recommendations for those elements not defined by the prior license or decree based upon the extent of beneficial use of the water right as of the date of the commencement of an adjudication.

§ 42-1428. Severability.

The provisions of this act are hereby declared to be severable and if any provision of this act or the application of such provision to any person or circumstance is declared invalid for any reason, such declaration shall not affect the validity of remaining portions of this act.